Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
675]

TOBACCO
LIABILITY ACT

Section

675-1 Findings and purpose

675-2 Definitions

675-3 Requirements

Note

The style of this chapter varies from the HRS because the
precise form of this chapter was necessary as agreed on in the master settlement
agreement to avoid nonpayment by tobacco manufacturers.

Cross References

Hawaii tobacco settlement moneys, see chapter 328L.

Tobacco products reporting, see chapter 486P.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next